th: โครงสร้างขอบสกี: ขอบโลหะเต็ม; ไม่มีขอบโลหะ; ขอบโลหะบางส่วน; อื่นๆ
it: Costruzione del bordo: Bordo interamente in metallo; Senza bordo in metallo; Bordo parzialmente in metallo; Altro
fi: Reunan rakenne: Täysmetallireuna; Ei metallireunaa; Osittainen metallireuna; Muu
ro-RO: Construcția marginii: Margine integrală din metal; Fără margine din metal; Margine parțială din metal; Altele
pt-BR: Construção da borda: Borda de metal inteiriça; Sem borda de metal; Borda de metal parcial; Outra
zh-CN: 边缘结构: 全金属边缘; 无金属边缘; 部分金属边缘; 其他
hr-HR: Konstrukcija ruba: Puni metalni rub; Bez metalnog ruba; Djelomični metalni rub; Ostalo
sv: Däckkonstruktion: Hel metallkant; Ingen metallkant; Delvis metallkant; Övrigt
bg-BG: Конструкция на острието: Цял метален кант; Без метален кант; Частичен метален кант; Друго
sk-SK: Konštrukcia okraja: Úplná kovová hrana; Bez kovovej hrany; Čiastočná kovová hrana; Iné
sl-SI: Konstrukcija roba: Popolnoma kovinski rob; Brez kovinskega roba; Delno kovinski rob; Drugo
zh-TW: 邊緣結構: 全金屬邊緣; 無金屬邊緣; 部分金屬邊緣; 其他
da: Kantkonstruktion: Fuld metalkant; Ingen metalkant; Delvis metalkant; Anden
ko: 에지 구조: 풀 메탈 엣지; 메탈 엣지 없음; 부분 메탈 엣지; 기타
es: Construcción de borde: Borde de metal completo; Sin borde de metal; Borde de metal parcial; Otro
vi: Cấu trúc mép viền: Cạnh kim loại toàn phần; Không có cạnh kim loại; Cạnh kim loại một phần; Khác
ru: Конструкция канта: Полностью металлический кант; Без металлического канта; Частично металлический кант; Другое
fr: Construction des bords: Carre métallique complète; Sans carre métallique; Carre métallique partielle; Autre
pl: Konstrukcja krawędzi: Pełna metalowa krawędź; Brak metalowej krawędzi; Częściowa metalowa krawędź; Inna
en: Edge construction: Full metal edge; No metal edge; Partial metal edge; Other
nb: Kantkonstruksjon: Hel metallkant; Ingen metallkant; Delvis metallkant; Annet
nl: Randconstructie: Volledig metalen rand; Geen metalen rand; Gedeeltelijke metalen rand; Anders
de: Kantenkonstruktion: Durchgehende Metallkante; Keine Metallkante; Teilweise Metallkante; Sonstige
el: Κατασκευή άκρου: Εξολοκλήρου μεταλλική ακμή; Χωρίς μεταλλική ακμή; Μερικώς μεταλλική ακμή; Άλλο
ja: エッジ構造: フルメタルエッジ; メタルエッジなし; パーシャルメタルエッジ; その他
cs: Konstrukce hran: Celokovová hrana; Bez kovové hrany; Částečná kovová hrana; Ostatní
hu: Él kialakítása: Teljes fémél; Nincs fémél; Részleges fémél; Egyéb
tr: Kenar yapısı: Tam metal kenar; Metal kenar yok; Kısmi metal kenar; Diğer
lt-LT: Kraštų konstrukcija: Visiškai metalinė briauna; Be metalinės briaunos; Dalinė metalinė briauna; Kita
pt-PT: Construção do rebordo: Bordo de metal integral; Sem bordo de metal; Bordo de metal parcial; Outro